California statutes. Elections Code
(a) The willful, unauthorized disclosure of information obtained from the department pursuant to Section 2265 to any person, or the use of any false representation to obtain any of that information or the use of any of that information for a purpose other than as stated in Section 2265, is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000) or imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding one year, or both fine and imprisonment.

(b) The Secretary of State shall establish procedures to protect the confidentiality of the information acquired from the department pursuant to Section 2265. The disclosure of this information shall be governed by the Information
 Practices Act of 1977 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1798) of Title 1.8 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code), and the Secretary of State shall account for any disclosures, including those due to security breaches, in accordance with that act.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 2264 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 314, Sec. 4.   (AB 796)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2267.

(a) If the records of a person designated in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2265 constitute a completed voter registration application, the Secretary of State shall register the person to vote, or, as applicable, preregister the person to vote, unless any of the following conditions is satisfied:

(1) The person’s records, as described in Section 2265, reflect that the person affirmatively declined to become registered or preregistered to vote during a transaction with the department.

(2) The person’s records, as described in Section 2265, do not reflect that the person has attested to meeting all voter eligibility requirements
 specified in Section 2101 or, as applicable, all preregistration eligibility requirements in subdivision (d) of Section 2102.

(3) The Secretary of State determines that the person is ineligible to vote or, as applicable, will be ineligible to vote when the person reaches 18 years of age.

(b) If a person who is registered or preregistered to vote pursuant to this chapter does not provide a party preference, the person’s party preference shall be designated as “Unknown” on a voter registration index under Article 5 (commencing with Section 2183) of Chapter 2, and the person shall otherwise be treated as a “No Party Preference” voter.

(c) If the Secretary of State receives from the department pursuant to paragraph (1)
 of subdivision (b) of Section 2265 the records of a person who is currently registered to vote, the Secretary of State shall use the information in the records to update the voter’s registration information. If the Secretary of State does not receive information for the voter pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2265 for which space is provided on the voter registration application, but that information was provided in the voter’s previous voter registration application, that information from the voter’s previous voter registration application shall remain part of the voter’s record.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 2265 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 314, Sec. 6.   (AB 796)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2268.

A person registered or preregistered to vote under this chapter may cancel the person’s voter registration or preregistration at any time by any method available to any other registered or preregistered voter.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 2266 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 314, Sec. 7.   (AB 796)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2269.

This chapter does not affect the confidentiality of a person’s voter registration or preregistration information, which remains confidential pursuant to Section 2194 of this code and Section 7924.000 of the Government Code and for all of the following persons:

(a) A victim of domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking pursuant to Section 2166.5.

(b) A reproductive health care service provider, employee, volunteer, or patient pursuant to Section 2166.5.

(c) A public safety officer pursuant to Section 2166.7.

(d) A
 person with a life-threatening circumstance upon court order pursuant to Section 2166.

(e) A qualified worker pursuant to Section 2166.8.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 854, Sec. 3.   (AB 3284)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2270.

If a person who is ineligible to vote becomes registered or preregistered to vote pursuant to this chapter in the absence of a violation by that person of Section 18100, that person’s registration or preregistration shall be presumed to have been effected with official authorization and not the fault of that person.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 2268 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 314, Sec. 9.   (AB 796)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2271.

If a person who is ineligible to vote becomes registered or preregistered to vote pursuant to this chapter and votes or attempts to vote in an election held after the effective date of the person’s registration or preregistration, that person shall be presumed to have acted with official authorization and shall not be guilty of fraudulently voting or attempting to vote pursuant to Section 18560, unless that person willfully votes or attempts to vote knowing that the person is not entitled to vote.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 2269 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 314, Sec. 10.   (AB 796)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2272.

(a) The department shall designate an employee, known as the department’s National Voter Registration Act (NVRA) coordinator, who shall be responsible for the department’s compliance with the requirements of this chapter and the requirements of Section 20504 of Title 52 of the United States Code. The responsibilities of the department’s NVRA coordinator include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Ensuring the accurate processing and timely transmission of voter registration applications submitted to the department.

(2) Ensuring employees are trained pursuant to Section 2273.

(3) Coordinating with the Secretary of State’s NVRA coordinator to ensure the department’s compliance with this chapter and with Section 20504 of Title 52 of the United States Code.

(4) Ensuring that the interagency agreement required by Section 2265 is updated as necessary.

(5) Preparing monthly reports pursuant to Section 2274.

(6) Notifying the Secretary of State within three days of identifying any violations of this chapter or Section 20504 of Title 52 of the United States Code.

(7) Assisting with the preparation of the annual report required by Section 2276.

(b) The Secretary of State shall appoint an employee, known as the Secretary of State’s NVRA coordinator, who shall be responsible for the Secretary of State’s compliance with the requirements of this chapter and the requirements of Section 20504 of Title 52 of the United States Code. The responsibilities of the Secretary of State’s NVRA coordinator include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Monitoring voter registration records received from the department and identifying untimely registrations or other irregularities.

(2) Ensuring the accurate processing and timely transmission of voter registration applications received from the department.

(3) Ensuring employees are trained pursuant to Section 2273.

(4) Coordinating with the department’s NVRA coordinator to ensure the Secretary of State’s compliance with this chapter and with Section 20504 of Title 52 of the United States Code.

(5) Ensuring the interagency agreement required by Section 2265 is updated as necessary.

(6) Publishing the monthly reports required by Section 2274 on the Secretary of State’s internet website.

(7) Preparing the annual report required by Section 2276.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 314, Sec. 12.   (AB 796)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2273.

(a) The department’s NVRA coordinator shall ensure that each employee of the department who interacts with the California New Motor Voter Program shall, annually and as part of an initial new employee orientation, receive a training on the requirements of this chapter and the federal National Voter Registration Act of 1993 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20501 et seq.). The training shall include, but is not limited to, instructing employees regarding processing voter information submitted to the department, acceptance rules, transmission deadlines, and procedures for identifying and reporting errors or delays.

(b) The Secretary of State’s NVRA coordinator shall ensure that each
 employee of the Secretary of State responsible for the receipt and processing of voter registration information from the department shall, annually and as part of an initial new employee orientation, receive a training on the requirements of this chapter and the federal National Voter Registration Act of 1993 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20501 et seq.). The training shall include, but is not limited to, instructing employees regarding procedures for the regular monitoring of the timeliness of the receipt of registration data from department transactions and the protocol for reporting and addressing problems with the timeliness and quality of the voter registration data received from the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 314, Sec. 13.   (AB 796)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2274.

(a) The department, in consultation with the Secretary of State, shall monitor the timeliness of the department’s transmittals to the Secretary of State pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 2265.

(b) By the 10th day of each calendar month, the department shall provide to the Secretary of State, in a manner and method to be determined by the department in consultation with the Secretary of State, all of the following information concerning voter registration from the preceding month: 

(1) The number of completed voter registration applications transmitted to the Secretary of State after
 the deadlines specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 2265, if any.

(2) The number of notices sent pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 2265.

(3) The reasons for any irregularities in the processing of records specified in subdivision (b) of Section 2265 or in the transmittal of any completed voter registration applications after the deadlines described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 2265.

(c) Within 10 days of receipt, the Secretary of State shall publish the information described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) on its internet website.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 314, Sec. 14.   (AB 796)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2275.

(a) The Secretary of State shall establish a taskforce that includes all of the following members:

(1) The Secretary of State’s NVRA coordinator.

(2) The department’s NVRA coordinator.

(3) County elections officials.

(4) Individuals with demonstrated language accessibility experience for languages covered under the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.).

(5) Representatives of the disability community and community organizations and individuals that advocate on behalf of, or provide
 services to, individuals with disabilities.

(6) Experts with demonstrated experience in the field of elections.

(7) Experts with demonstrated experience in the field of civic design.

(b) The Secretary of State shall convene the taskforce for meetings at least quarterly.

(c) The taskforce shall consult with the Secretary of State and the department on the development of the annual review required by Section 2276.

(d) The taskforce shall advise the Secretary of State and the department on the effective implementation of the California New Motor Voter Program.

This section shall remain in effect only until January 1,
 2030, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute that is enacted before January 1,
 2030, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 378, Sec. 1.   (AB 2127)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2276.

The Secretary of State, in consultation with the department and the taskforce described in Section 2275, shall annually review the effectiveness of the California New Motor Voter Program and draft a written report. The written report shall, at a minimum, include all of the following:

(a) Information about trends of voters registering through the California New Motor Voter Program.

(b) An analysis of the information described in Section 2274 for the preceding year.

(c) A summary of any significant errors or delays during the preceding year with respect to processing
 or transmitting the records specified in subdivision (b) of Section 2265, and how those incidents were resolved.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 314, Sec. 16.   (AB 796)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2277.

The Secretary of State shall adopt regulations to implement this chapter, including regulations addressing both of the following:

(a) A process for canceling the registration or preregistration of a person who is ineligible to vote, but became registered or preregistered under the California New Motor Voter Program in the absence of any violation by that person of Section 18100.

(b) An education and outreach campaign informing voters about the California New Motor Voter Program that the Secretary of State will conduct to implement this chapter. The Secretary of State may use any public and private funds available for this and shall provide
 materials created for this outreach and education campaign in languages other than English, as required by the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10503).

(History: Added by renumbering Section 2270 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 314, Sec. 11.   (AB 796)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Voter Bill of Rights [2300. - 2302.]

2300.

(a) All voters, pursuant to the California Constitution and this code, shall be citizens of the United States. There shall be a Voter Bill of Rights for voters, available to the public, which shall convey all of the following to voters:

(1) (A) You have the right to cast a ballot if you are a valid registered voter.

(B) A valid registered voter means a United States citizen who is a resident in this state, who is at least 18 years of age and not serving a state or federal prison term for conviction of a felony, and who is registered to vote at their current residence address.

(2) You have the right to cast a provisional ballot if your name is not listed on the voting rolls.

(3) You have the right to cast a ballot if you are present and in line at the polling place before the close of the polls.

(4) You have the right to cast a secret ballot free from intimidation.

(5) (A) You have the right to receive a new ballot if, before casting your ballot, you believe you made a mistake.

(B) If at any time before you finally cast your ballot, you feel you have made a mistake, you have the right to exchange the spoiled ballot for a new ballot. Vote by mail voters may
 also request and receive a new ballot if they return their spoiled ballot to an elections official before the closing of the polls.

(6) You have the right to receive assistance in casting your ballot, if you are unable to vote without assistance.

(7) You have the right to return a completed vote by mail ballot to any precinct in the county.

(8) You have the right to election materials in another language, if there are sufficient residents in your precinct to warrant production.

(9) (A) You have the right to ask questions about election procedures and observe the election process.

(B) You have the right to ask questions of the precinct board and elections officials regarding election procedures and to receive an answer or be directed to the appropriate official for an answer. However, if persistent questioning disrupts the execution of their duties, the precinct board or elections officials may discontinue responding to questions.

(10) You have the right to report any illegal or fraudulent activity to a local elections official or to the Secretary of State’s office.

(b) Beneath the Voter Bill of Rights there shall be listed a toll-free telephone number to call if a person has been denied a voting right or to report election fraud or misconduct.

(c) The Secretary of State may do both of the
 following:

(1) Develop regulations to implement and clarify the Voter Bill of Rights set forth in subdivision (a).

(2) Revise the wording of the Voter Bill of Rights as necessary to ensure the use of clear and concise language free from technical terms.

(d) The Voter Bill of Rights set forth in subdivisions (a) and (b) shall be made available to the public before each election and on election day, at a minimum, as follows:

(1) The Voter Bill of Rights shall be printed in the state voter information guide, pursuant to Section 9084, in a minimum of 12-point type. Subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision
 (a), subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (a), and subparagraph (B) of paragraph (9) of subdivision (a) may be printed in a smaller point type than the rest of the Voter Bill of Rights.

(2) Posters or other printed materials containing the Voter Bill
 of Rights shall be included in precinct supplies pursuant to Section 14105.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 320, Sec. 8.   (AB 646)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Note: The operational condition in Sec. 10 of Ch. 320 was satisfied by approval of Prop. 17 (ACA 6) at the Nov. 3, 2020, election.)
-------------------------------------------

2301.

(a) An international election observer may be provided uniform and nondiscriminatory access to all stages of the election process that are open to the public, including the public review period for the certification of a ballot marking system, the processing and counting of vote by mail ballots, the canvassing of ballots, and the recounting of ballots. An international election observer shall not interfere with a voter in the preparation or casting of the voter's ballot, with a precinct board member or an elections official in the performance of his or her duties, or with the orderly conduct of an election.

(b) For purposes of this section, “international election observer” means a person who witnesses
 the administration of an election in this state and who is an official representative of an international organization such as the United Nations, the Organization for Security and Cooperation in Europe, or the Organization of American States.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 822, Sec. 1.   (AB 2021)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2302.

A voter or any other person shall not be prohibited from using an electronic device, including a smartphone, tablet, or other handheld device, at a polling place provided that the use of the device does not result in a violation of Section 14221, 14224, 14291, 18370, 18502, 18540, 18541, or any other provision of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 561, Sec. 1.   (AB 1707)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Voter Registration Agencies [2400. - 2408.]

2400.

It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this chapter, to facilitate compliance with the requirements set forth in the federal National Voter Registration Act of 1993 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20501 et seq.) relating to voter registration services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 732, Sec. 15.   (AB 1536)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2401.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Voter preference form” means the form described in Section 20506(a)(6)(B) of Title 52 of the United States Code.

(b) “Voter registration agency” means either of the following:

(1) A department, division, or office of state or local government, or a program supported by state funds, that is designated by executive order of the Governor or pursuant to the federal
 National Voter Registration Act of 1993
 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20501 et seq.) as a voter registration agency.

(2) A private entity under contract with a designated voter registration agency to provide services or assistance on behalf of the designated voter registration agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 732, Sec. 16.   (AB 1536)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2402.

(a) The Secretary of State is the chief state elections official responsible for coordination of the state’s responsibilities under the federal National Voter Registration Act of 1993 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20501 et seq.).

(b) The Secretary of State shall adopt such regulations as are necessary to implement this chapter and the federal National Voter Registration Act of 1993
 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20501 et seq.).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 732, Sec. 17.   (AB 1536)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2403.

(a) A voter registration agency shall comply with the applicable duties and responsibilities of a voter registration agency set forth in the federal National Voter Registration Act of 1993 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20501 et seq.).

(b) A voter registration agency, with each application for service or assistance and with each recertification, renewal, or change of address form relating to the service or assistance, and in accordance with the federal National Voter Registration Act of 1993
 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20501 et seq.), shall provide to an applicant all of the following:

(1) A voter preference form.

(2) A voter registration card, unless the applicant, in writing, declines to register to vote.

(3) Assistance in completing the voter registration card, unless the applicant refuses the assistance.

(c) For purposes of subdivision (b), an applicant’s failure to respond to the question of whether he or she would like to register to vote does not constitute a declination to register.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 732, Sec. 18.   (AB 1536)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2404.

(a) The Secretary of State shall do all of the following:

(1) Coordinate with each county elections official and voter registration agency to implement this chapter.

(2) Prepare written training materials that describe the responsibilities of a county elections official and voter registration agency pursuant to this chapter and the federal National Voter Registration Act of 1993 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20501 et seq.).

(3) Contact a
 voter registration agency if the agency is not complying with the requirements of this chapter and the federal National Voter Registration Act of 1993
 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20501 et seq.).

(4) Coordinate with each state agency that evaluates the performance of an agency designated as a voter registration agency, including doing both of the following:

(A) Communicate to the state agency the requirements of, and best practices for complying with, this chapter and the federal National Voter Registration Act of 1993 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20501 et seq.).

(B) Assist the state agency in its effort to help a voter registration agency comply with the requirements of this chapter or the federal National Voter Registration Act of 1993
 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20501 et seq.).

(b) The Secretary of State may do any of the following:

(1) Conduct a review of a voter registration agency’s compliance with the requirements of this chapter or the federal National Voter Registration Act of 1993 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20501 et seq.).

(2) Conduct a review of a county elections official’s compliance with the requirements of this chapter or the federal National Voter Registration Act of 1993
 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20501 et seq.) if the county elections official fails to timely submit a report pursuant to Section 2407, or if a report indicates that the county elections official is not complying with the requirements of this chapter or the federal National Voter Registration Act of 1993 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20501 et seq.).

(3) Post the results of a review conducted pursuant to this subdivision on the Secretary of State’s Internet Web site.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 732, Sec. 19.   (AB 1536)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2405.

(a) A county elections official shall be responsible for coordinating with the Secretary of State and each applicable voter registration agency within the county to administer the voter registration services required pursuant to this chapter and the federal National Voter Registration Act of 1993 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20501 et seq.).

(b) The county elections official shall do all of the following:

(1) Provide voter registration cards to a voter registration agency upon request of the voter
 registration agency.

(2) Maintain a record of the number of voter registration cards provided to and received from each voter registration agency, and each office or site of the voter registration agency.

(3) Assist a voter registration agency, upon request, in conducting a training program for its employees based on the training materials prepared by the Secretary of State on the requirements of this chapter and the federal National Voter Registration Act of 1993 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20501
 et seq.).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 732, Sec. 20.   (AB 1536)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2406.

(a) A voter registration agency shall do all of the following:

(1) Notify the county elections official of each applicable county of the location of each of the voter registration agency’s offices or sites within the county.

(2) Designate an agency employee to be responsible for the agency’s compliance with this section.

(3) Request voter registration cards from the applicable county elections official, as needed.

(4) Take steps to ensure that the voter registration agency, and each office or site
 of the voter registration agency, has a sufficient supply of voter preference forms and voter registration cards available, including voter preference forms and voter registration cards in all languages required by Section 203 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10503) or Section 4(f)(4) (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10303(f)(4)) of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965.

(5) Ensure that each employee of the voter registration agency who may provide voter registration services completes, at least once per
 year, a training based on the training materials prepared by the Secretary of State on the requirements of this chapter and the federal National Voter Registration Act of 1993 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20501 et seq.). The voter registration agency may incorporate this training into any other training program provided by the voter registration agency for its employees.

(b) A voter registration agency may conduct a review of the agency, or an office or site of the agency, as necessary, to ensure compliance with this chapter and the federal National Voter Registration Act of 1993 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20501 et seq.).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 732, Sec. 21.   (AB 1536)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2407.

Within 10 days after the beginning of each calendar month, a county elections official shall report to the Secretary of State, on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State, the number of voter registration cards received from each voter registration agency and from each office or site thereof. The Secretary of State shall post the information contained in each report received from a county elections official on the Secretary of State’s Internet Web site.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 505, Sec. 2.   (SB 35)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2408.

(a) A voter registration agency that allows a person to apply online for service or assistance, or to submit a recertification, renewal, or change of address form relating to the service or assistance online, shall implement a process and infrastructure that allows an applicant to electronically submit a voter preference form to the voter registration agency, and to submit an affidavit of voter registration electronically on the Internet Web site of the Secretary of State in accordance with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 2196).

(b) If a person indicates on his or her electronic voter preference form that he or she would like to register to vote, the person shall be informed that he or she may register to vote through one of the following options, if
 applicable:

(1) Submit an affidavit of voter registration electronically on the Secretary of State’s Internet Web site pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 2196.

(2) Complete an affidavit of voter registration electronically on the Secretary of State’s Internet Web site, print a hard copy of the completed affidavit, and mail or deliver the hard copy of the completed affidavit to the Secretary of State or the appropriate county elections official pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 2196.

(c) A voter registration agency may take steps to ensure that the information entered into a person’s electronic application for service or assistance, or his or her electronic recertification, renewal, or change of address form relating to the service or assistance, will be automatically transferred to the electronic affidavit
 of voter registration if the person indicates that he or she would like to register to vote.

(d) The Secretary of State shall take steps to ensure that the electronic affidavit of voter registration is available, and may be electronically submitted and verified, in all languages in which a county is required to provide voting materials pursuant to Section 203 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10503) or Section 4(f)(4) (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10303(f)(4)) of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 732, Sec. 22.   (AB 1536)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Election Management Systems [2500. - 2550.]

2500.

As used in this chapter, an “election management system” is a system that is used by a county in the state to track voter registration or voter preferences, including, for example, a voter’s vote-by-mail status.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 268, Sec. 1.   (AB 829)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2501.

(a) No later than January 31, 2014, and annually thereafter, the vendor of an election management system shall cause an exact copy of the source code for each component of the election management system, including complete build and configuration instructions and related documents for compiling the source code into object code, to be deposited into an approved escrow facility. The vendor shall place in escrow source codes for each version of the election management system in use in a county in the state.

(b) The Secretary of State shall adopt regulations relating to all of the following:

(1) The definition of source code components of an election management system, including source
 code for all firmware and software of the election management system. Firmware and software shall include commercial off-the-shelf or other third-party firmware and software that is available and able to be disclosed by the vendor of the election management system.

(2) Specifications for the escrow facility, including security and environmental specifications necessary for the preservation of the election management system source codes.

(3) Procedures for submitting election management system source codes.

(4) Criteria for access to election management system source codes.

(5) Requirements for the vendor to include in the materials deposited in escrow build and configuration instructions and documents so that a neutral third party may create, from the
 source codes in escrow, executable object codes identical to the code installed on the election management system.

(c) The Secretary of State shall have reasonable access to the materials placed in escrow, under the following circumstances:

(1) In the course of an investigation or prosecution regarding election management system equipment or procedures.

(2) Upon a finding by the Secretary of State that an escrow facility or escrow company is unable or unwilling to maintain materials in escrow in compliance with this section.

(3) For any other purpose deemed necessary to fulfill the provisions of this code or Section 12172.5 of the Government Code.

(d) The Secretary of State may seek
 injunctive relief requiring the elections officials, approved escrow facility, or any vendor or manufacturer of an election management system to comply with this section and related regulations. Venue for a proceeding under this section shall be exclusively in Sacramento County.

(e) This section applies to all elections.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 268, Sec. 1.   (AB 829)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2550.

(a) For purposes of this section, “electronic poll book” means an electronic list of registered voters that may be transported to the polling location. An electronic poll book shall contain all of the following voter registration data:

(1) Name.

(2) Address.

(3) Precinct.

(4) Party preference.

(5) Whether or not the voter has been issued a vote by mail ballot.

(6) Whether or
 not the vote by mail ballot has been recorded as received by the elections official.

(b) An electronic poll book shall not be used unless it has been certified by the Secretary of State.

(c) The Secretary of State shall adopt and publish electronic poll book standards and regulations governing the certification and use of electronic poll books.

(d) The Secretary of State shall not certify an electronic poll book unless it fulfills the requirements of this section and the Secretary of State’s standards and regulations. The Secretary of State may impose additional conditions of approval as deemed necessary by the Secretary of State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 605, Sec. 2.   (SB 1328)   Effective September 25, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Language Accessibility [2600. - 2600.]

2600.

The Secretary of State shall establish a Language Accessibility Advisory Committee which shall meet no less than four times each calendar year. The committee shall consist of no less than 15 members and be comprised of the Secretary of State and his or her designee or designees and additional members appointed by the Secretary of State. The appointees shall have demonstrated language accessibility experience, have knowledge of presenting election materials to voters using plain language methods or another method that is easy for voters to access and understand, or be a county elections official or his or her designee. At least three county elections officials shall be appointed to the committee. The Secretary of State shall consult with and consider the recommendations of the committee. The committee shall serve in an advisory capacity to the Secretary
 of State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 92.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Native American Voters [2700. - 2700.]

2700.

(a) The Secretary of State shall establish a Native American Voting Accessibility Advisory Committee. The Secretary of State shall consult with the committee to consider the committee’s recommendations related to improving the accessibility of elections for Native American voters. The Secretary of State may implement the committee’s recommendations as appropriate.

(b) The committee shall consist of the Secretary of State, the Secretary of State’s designees, and additional members appointed by the Secretary of State. Each appointee shall have demonstrated
 experience with voting rights or be a county elections official.

(c) The committee shall serve in an advisory capacity to the Secretary of State and shall do all of the following:

(1) Establish guidelines for reaching as many Native American voters as practical.

(2) Make recommendations for improving the availability and accessibility of election materials, including, but not limited to, state voter information guides, county voter information guides, and vote-by-mail ballots, and their delivery in print or alternative formats to Native American voters.

(3) Make recommendations for the distribution of public service announcements identifying the availability of election materials for Native American voters with at least 45 days before any federal,
 state, and local election.

(4) Promote to Native American voters the Secretary of State’s toll-free voter registration telephone line for citizens needing voter registration information.

(5) Make recommendations for providing Native American voters with information regarding voter registration and voting processes, and voting rights.

(6) Make recommendations to improve the recruitment of Native American poll workers.

(7) Establish subcommittees to further the scope and purposes of the committee as they relate to improving voter services and access for Native American voters.

(8) Make recommendations for providing information and services to Native American voters regarding language
 assistance.

(9) Promote the use of plain language and alternative formats for election materials distributed to Native American voters.

(10) Make recommendations for materials to train poll workers on issues related to serving Native American voters.

(d) A member shall not receive compensation, but each member shall be reimbursed for the member’s reasonable and necessary expenses in connection with service on the committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 124, Sec. 25.   (AB 938)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 3. VOTE BY MAIL VOTING, NEW RESIDENT, AND NEW CITIZEN VOTING [3000. - 3123.]



CHAPTER 1. Vote by Mail Application and Voting Procedures [3000. - 3026.]

3000.

This division shall be liberally construed in favor of the vote by mail voter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 508, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

3000.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, for each election, the elections official shall, no later than 29 days before the day of the election, begin mailing the materials specified in Section 3010 to every registered voter. The elections official shall have five days to mail a ballot to each person who is registered to vote on the 29th day before the day of the election and five days to mail a ballot to each person who is subsequently registered to vote. The elections official shall not discriminate against any region or precinct in choosing which ballots to mail first within the prescribed five-day mailing period.

(b) The distribution of vote by mail ballots to all registered voters does not
 prevent a voter from voting in person at a polling place, vote center, or other authorized location.
